District of Columbia statutes.
38-2905.01

Supplement to foundation level funding on the basis of the count of at-risk students.

(a)

In addition to the grade level and supplemental allocations provided pursuant to §§ 38-2904 and 38-2905, additional allocations shall be provided on the basis of the count of students identified as at-risk.

(b)

The additional allocations required by subsection (a) of this section shall be calculated by applying a weighting factor, as determined by the Mayor, to the foundation level.

(c)

The weighting for at-risk students shall be applied cumulatively in the counts of students who fall into more than one of the formula weighting categories; provided, that for students identified as both as at-risk and as participating in an alternative program or as adult learners, only the alternative program weighting shall apply.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-207, § 106a
as added Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-87, § 4(b), 61 DCR 309
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 4002(d), 61 DCR 9990

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-2907.01.

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-87 added this section.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added “provided, that for students identified as both as at-risk and as participating in an alternative program or as adult learners, only the alternative program weighting shall apply” in (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-87, § 5, see § 7006 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4002(d) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-87, § 5, see § 7006 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4002(d) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-87, § 5, see § 7006 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4002(d) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-87, § 5, see § 7006 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-87: Section 5 of D.C. Law 20-87 provided that § 4(b) of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 5 of D.C. Law 20-87 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7006.